




5 Steps to Independence Video










































Close







BILL RAPP


Loan Officer | NMLS 228246Licensed in AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, GA, IL, LA, NJ, OH, OK, PA, TX, & VA














STEP 1 : WATCH THE VIDEO







RITCHIE DERAICHE









STEP 2: BOOK YOUR FREE ANALYSIS SESSION





Click here - Phone App & Mortgage Calculator







CONSULT AN EXPERT - FREE OF CHARGE




































GET YOUR FREE ANALYSIS








REQUEST YOUR FREE ANALYSIS SESSION


















Step 3: Download your free Mortgage Calculator









HERE'S WHAT YOU WILL RECEIVE ON THAT FREE ANALYSIS SESSION:








COMPLETELY FREE CREDIT SCORE BOOSTING AUDIT 


A STEP-BY-STEP PLAN TO BUY AN INVESTMENT PROPERTY THOUSANDS UNDER THE LISTING PRICE















KNOWLEDGEABLE, HONEST, AND RELIABLE


“I will definitely keep you in mind . If anyone I know needs financing, I will send them your way!”







COULD NOT HAVE ASKED FOR A BETTER EXPERIENCE..








WITH PROVEN STRATEGIES, PROVEN RESULTS, HERE'S WHAT MY CLIENTS SAY:


JONSALEEM,CRPC®FINANCIALADVISOR – HOUSTON, TX





"Best damn Mortgage guy a man could know!"







GABE & CHELSEA JACKSON – PEARLAND, TX


Resources & Links1. CLICK HERE FOR PRIVATE FUNDING FOR "FLIPS"2. FIND A CCIM BROKER3. CLICK HERE FOR CREDIT REPAIR INFORMATION

















CLAIM YOUR FREE ANALYSIS SESSION NOW




































GET YOUR FREE ANALYSIS








REQUEST YOUR FREE ANALYSIS SESSION








Save Thousands of dollars with your free analysis session - claim it below







Commercial Financing
If you have never had to deal with commercial real estate financing, you may find it intimidating. That is certainly the case for most first-time commercial borrowers. Commercial real estate mortgages are quite different from their residential cousins in terms of both complexity and cost. But getting the facts before you apply for a loan should eliminate any fears about this fantastic business financing technique.

The Basics of Commercial Real Estate Financing

Commercial real estate financing is very similar to residential mortgage lending in that real property is pledged as collateral against a loan to either buy or refinance the property. A business may also borrow against the equity in property it owns, which like its residential counterpart can take the form of a business line of credit or a lump sum payment for any business purpose. Commercial real estate mortgages generally require regular payments of principal and interest -- commercial mortgage rates can be either fixed or variable -- until the loan is paid in full. Moreover, a commercial lender retains a security interest in the property throughout the loan term, with the same right to foreclose if the borrower defaults as a residential lender. 

What distinguishes commercial mortgage lending from residential lending are the characteristics of the property and the borrower. Unlike residential mortgages, which are geared toward the individual and 1-4 unit residential dwellings, commercial property financing is designed for business entities -- both for profit and not-for-profit -- to mortgage nearly any type of retail, office, industrial, multi-unit (5+) unit residential, or just about any other commercially zoned real property.

Because of these property and borrower characteristics, commercial real estate mortgages are viewed as higher risk transactions by the lending industry. The limited marketability of commercial property and higher risk of borrower default translates to less generous terms and more conservative underwriting by commercial mortgage lenders than those found in the residential arena. If a lender has to take possession of a commercial property through foreclosure, it will generally have much more difficulty selling it to recoup its money than it would a house. To compensate for the greater risk, commercial mortgage rates are substantially higher as are down payment requirements, and loan terms are shorter (typically a maximum of 25/30 years). 

Commercial mortgage lenders prefer a solid business borrower, but for newer businesses or companies that cannot meet the required financial performance standards, a personal guarantee of repayment from one or more of the firm's principals may be used to compensate. 

A final important difference between commercial real estate financing and the residential variety is that commercial real estate mortgages are more expensive to process and close. Not only are they much larger loans on average than residential mortgages, but nearly every aspect of the "due diligence" phase -- from valuation, to title, to underwriting -- is more complicated and, therefore, more costly. 

An Illustration: The "Vanilla" Commercial Mortgage Loan

To help you understand how commercial mortgage lending works in practice, here are the major characteristics of a standard "vanilla" commercial mortgage loan.

Debt Coverage Ratio

Commercial real estate financing is based primarily on the income of the property rather than the borrower. The lender will want evidence that the property will produce more than enough income to cover the mortgage payments. Generally, commercial mortgage lenders require the property to produce from 1.1 to 1.25 times the monthly mortgage payment in net rental income. For example, if the monthly mortgage payment is $2,000, the property should be producing $2,200 to $2,500 after all expenses are paid. 

Down Payment

Commercial mortgage loans typically require a borrower to put a minimum of 25% down. A higher down payment may be required for certain properties that carry greater risk, newer companies or those without a solid track record of consistent profitability.

Prepayment Penalties

Commercial real estate mortgages normally carry deescalating prepayment penalties, that is, a fee due to the lender if the loan is paid off within a certain period of time after it is made. For example, the fee might be 5% of the outstanding balance during the first year, 4% the second year, and so on, with no penalty after the fifth year. For obvious reasons, prepayment penalties are a particularly important consideration for a business that may not wish to -- or be able to -- own the property long enough to avoid them.

Although these characteristics illustrate a “standard” in commercial real estate mortgages, you can find many lenders with flexibility in any of them. Generally, deviating from a standard will entail an offsetting adjustment in others to compensate for the increased risk. For example, an up-front fee or higher interest rate might reduce or entirely eliminate a prepayment penalty, while a personal guarantee from one or more company owners might reduce the required down payment.
Where to Go For Commercial Real Estate Financing

Commercial mortgage lending is widely available throughout the U.S. The three most common sources of commercial real estate mortgages are:
1. Commercial Mortgage Backed Securities2. Regional Banks3. Private Equity Companies - i.e. Life Insurance Companies / Pension Manager / Hedge Funds4. Specialty Finance Companies - i.e. Third-Party ("Conduit") and Hard Money Lenders
Commercial Mortgage Brokers
Naturally, most business owners turn to banks -- particularly ones with whom they have established relationships -- for their commercial real estate financing. On the one hand, banks tend to offer the lowest commercial mortgage rates; on the other, they are the most rigid in their lending. Many banks will refuse loans on certain classes of property or exclude companies from specific industries. They also require more documentation and may charge higher fees than other commercial mortgage lending sources.

Conduit and hard money lenders can fund commercial mortgage loans with less documentation and more quickly than banks. Because their money comes from private sources, insurance companies, and commercial lines of credit, they can be much more flexible in their lending. You will find that hard money lenders, in particular, will loan money at lightning speed on virtually any type of property with much less stringent criteria for their borrowers -- all at a cost: Hard Money Lenders charge significantly higher mortgage rates than banks.

For larger capital needs, companies often turn to private equity companies. Private equity companies can provide critical commercial real estate financing on the total cost of a project. The equity range is the difference between the total cost of the real estate and the amount the senior lender is willing to provide -- normally no more than 75 percent of costs. So, for a $5 million project, commercial mortgage lenders would typically loan no more than $3.8 million, leaving $1.2 million in the equity range for the borrower to fund. If the borrowing entity has $200,000 in cash to put into the project, it could consider a mezzanine loan or an equity capital investment to come up with the remaining $1 million. Private Equity Companies are quite versatile and they can provide creative, flexible financing solutions, but they expect a good return on investment, so their interest rates are considerably higher than those charged by commercial lenders. Commercial mortgage brokers don't fund loans directly. Instead, a good broker will conduct a thorough assessment of your needs and research the programs offered by other commercial mortgage lending sources to find you the right mortgage solution with the most competitive rates and fees. A good commercial mortgage broker will have established relationships with many different lenders offering a wide variety of lending programs, giving you access to financing you might not be able to find on your own. As an added benefit, commercial mortgage brokers handle the tedious details of loan processing and packaging, making an otherwise complex transaction less stressful and saving you much time and energy. Using just any commercial mortgage broker could cost you either in up-front fees, a higher than market interest rate, or both. A good one, though, will orchestrate a smooth transaction with an optimal loan suited to your company's specific needs at a competitive rate.

With so many choices, it is important that you shop around, but the goal of your shopping should not be just to get the best rate. As is the case in residential mortgages, commercial mortgage rates and terms will vary from one lending source to the next. But with such a big financial commitment at stake, unless you have expertise in commercial real estate financing, you need a trusted advisor to both help you understand and to guide you through the complex process that defines a commercial mortgage loan. 

Regardless of the source you ultimately use, a little preparation before you begin your search for commercial real estate financing will go a long way towards reducing stress and assuring a good outcome.

Preparation: The Key to a Smooth Commercial Mortgage Lending Process

When you are ready to begin your search for a commercial mortgage lender, some advance preparation will serve you well. The complex nature of commercial real estate financing means you cannot expect to "rate shop" multiple lenders with a few minutes on the telephone -- at least, not with any reliability. 
Any prospective lender you contact should ask you for the following information, which is needed to give you an informed, accurate decision about your company's ability to borrow and the approximate rates and terms you can expect: 1. Year-to-date profit & loss statement and balance sheet 2. Three years business income tax returns 3. Projected cash flow for the next 36 months
4. Personal Financial Statement and Resume for the Principal5. Property information
6. Written business plan
Having these items available will not only make your task easier, it will make it more likely you receive both an accurate quote and solid feedback on your loan request. Be wary of any prospective lender who will quote rates and terms without the required information. You could be in for nasty surprises later!

Commercial real estate financing is another of the business financing power tools available to your company. Unlike other types of credit for business, which typically have less attractive terms and a relatively short repayment period, commercial mortgage loans offer an excellent means to acquire property and manage risk with long-term, asset based financing, at attractive interest rates and with favorable tax treatment.









Copyright 2016 © Veterans.BillRappOnline.com


Bill Rapp


Terms & Conditions -


Loan Officer, Houston


Privacy Policy







832-956-0901Network Funding, LP9700 Richmond Ave Ste 320Houston, TX 77042NMLS 2297



















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














SEC Info - JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26 - ‘10-K’ for 3/24/16











SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26 – ‘10-K’ for 3/24/16On:  Thursday, 3/24/16, at 8:51pm ET   ·   As of:  3/25/16   ·   For:  3/24/16   ·   Accession #:  1056404-16-3703   ·   File #:  333-190246-11
Previous ‘10-K’:  ‘10-K’ on 3/31/15 for 3/30/15   ·   Next & Latest:  ‘10-K’ on 3/22/17 for 12/31/16



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

 3/25/16  JPMBB Com'l Mtge Secs Tr 2014-C26 10-K        3/24/16   20:1.9M                                   Norwest Asset SEC Co..TrAsset-Backed Securities (ABS)Asset Class:  Commercial mortgages   ·   Sponsor:  JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.   ·   Depositor:  JP Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities CorpF-->Annual Report   —   Form 10-KFiling Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: 10-K        Annual Report                                       HTML    112K 
 3: EX-33.1     ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML     56K 
 7: EX-33.21    ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML    258K 
 8: EX-33.25    ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML     54K 
 9: EX-33.26    ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML     13K 
 4: EX-33.3     ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML    119K 
 5: EX-33.4     ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML    316K 
 6: EX-33.5     ABS - Report of Compliance with Servicing Criteria  HTML     89K 
10: EX-34.1     ABS - Attestation Report on Assessment of           HTML     13K 
                          Compliance with Servicing Criteria                     
14: EX-34.21    ABS - Attestation Report on Assessment of           HTML     18K 
                          Compliance with Servicing Criteria                     
15: EX-34.25    ABS - Attestation Report on Assessment of           HTML     13K 
                          Compliance with Servicing Criteria                     
11: EX-34.3     ABS - Attestation Report on Assessment of           HTML     19K 
                          Compliance with Servicing Criteria                     
12: EX-34.4     ABS - Attestation Report on Assessment of           HTML     16K 
                          Compliance with Servicing Criteria                     
13: EX-34.5     ABS - Attestation Report on Assessment of           HTML     14K 
                          Compliance with Servicing Criteria                     
17: EX-35.1     ABS - Servicer Compliance Statement                 HTML     40K 
19: EX-35.13    ABS - Servicer Compliance Statement                 HTML     13K 
20: EX-35.14    ABS - Servicer Compliance Statement                 HTML     12K 
18: EX-35.3     ABS - Servicer Compliance Statement                 HTML     11K 
16: EX-26.26    Invitation for Competitive Bids                     HTML     14K 
 2: EX-31       Certification -- Sarbanes-Oxley Act - Sect. 302     HTML     15K 

D-->10-K   —   Annual Report
H-->This is an HTML Document rendered as filed.  [ Alternative Formats ]


P-->

  10-K JPC14C26 201512  



UNITED STATES
 SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10‑K
 
(Mark one)
/X/ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
 EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

    For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015 

 OR
// TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES
 EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

For the transition period from              to             

 


 


 

Commission file number of the issuing entity:333-190246-11

 

Central Index Key Number of the issuing entity:0001625123

 

JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26
(exact name of the issuing entity as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the depositor:0001013611

 

J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp.
(exact name of the depositor as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the sponsor:0000835271

 

JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association
(exact name of the sponsor as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the sponsor:0001628601

 

Column Financial, Inc.
(exact name of the sponsor as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the sponsor:0000312070

 

Barclays Bank PLC
(exact name of the sponsor as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the sponsor:0001567746

 

Redwood Commercial Mortgage Corporation
(exact name of the sponsor as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the sponsor:0000040554

 

General Electric Capital Corporation
(exact name of the sponsor as specified in its charter)

 

Central Index Key Number of the sponsor:0001587045

 

RAIT Funding, LLC
(exact name of the sponsor as specified in its charter)

 


 




New York
(State or other jurisdiction of
 incorporation or organization of
the issuing entity)


38-3943164
38-3943165
38-3952036
38-7127873
(I.R.S. Employer
Identification Numbers)




 
c/o Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
as Certificate Administrator
9062 Old Annapolis Road
 Columbia, MD 
(Address of principal executive offices of the issuing entity)
 
21045
(Zip Code)
 
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: 
(212) 272‑6858


 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act: None.


 


Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None.


 


Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. / / Yes /X/ No


 


Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. / / Yes /X/ No


 


Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. /X/ Yes / / No


 


Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (Section 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files).


 


Not applicable.


 


Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (Section 229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K.


 


Not applicable.


 


Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See definitions of “large accelerated filer”, “accelerated filer” and “smaller reporting company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.


 


Large accelerated filer / /                                                                                          Accelerated filer / /

 Non-accelerated filer /X/ (Do not check if a smaller reporting company)                Smaller reporting company / /


 


Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). / / Yes /X/ No


 


State the aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-affiliates computed by reference to the price at which the common equity was last sold, or the average bid and asked price of such common equity, as of the last business day of the registrant’s most recently completed second fiscal quarter.


 


Not applicable.


 


Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed all documents and reports required to be filed by Section 12, 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 subsequent to the distribution of securities under a plan confirmed by a court. / / Yes / / No


 


Not applicable.


 


Indicate the number of shares outstanding of each of the registrant’s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date.


 


Not applicable.


 


DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE


 


List hereunder the following documents if incorporated by reference and the Part of the Form 10-K (e.g., Part I, Part II, etc.) into which the document is incorporated: (1) Any annual report to security holders; (2) Any proxy or information statement; and (3) Any prospectus filed pursuant to Rule 424(b) or (c) under the Securities Act of 1933. The listed documents should be clearly described for identification purposes (e.g., annual report to security holders for fiscal year ended December 24, 1980).


 


Not applicable.


 


EXPLANATORY NOTES


 


The 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan, the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan and The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan, which constituted approximately 6.9%, 3.3% and 3.1%, respectively, of the asset pool of the issuing entity as of its cut-off date, are each an asset of the issuing entity and are each part of a loan combination that includes (a) with respect to the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan which is an asset of the issuing entity and one other pari passu loan, which is not an asset of the issuing entity, (b) with respect to the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan which is an asset of the issuing entity and two other pari passu loans, which are not assets of the issuing entity or (c) with respect to The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan which is an asset of the issuing entity and one other pari passu loan, which is not an asset of the issuing entity. These loan combinations,
including the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan, St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan and The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan, are being serviced and administered pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, which is incorporated by reference as Exhibit 4.1 to this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as the master servicer under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, is also the primary servicer of each of these loan combinations. The responsibilities of Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as primary servicer of each of these loan combinations, are subsumed within its responsibilities as master servicer under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Thus, the servicer compliance statement provided by Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as master servicer under the Pooling and Servicing
Agreement, encompasses its roles as both master servicer and primary servicer with respect to these loan combinations.


 


The Exhibit Index describes exhibits provided by certain parties (in their capacities indicated on the Exhibit Index) with respect to the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan, which constituted approximately 1.5% of the asset pool of the issuing entity as of its cut-off date. The Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan is an asset of the issuing entity and is part of a loan combination that includes the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan and one other pari passu loan, which is not an asset of the issuing entity. The other pari passu portion of the loan combination was securitized in the JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C25 transaction, Commission File Number 333-190246-10 (the “JPMBB
2014-C25 Transaction”). This loan combination, including the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan, is being serviced and administered pursuant to the pooling and servicing agreement for the JPMBB 2014-C25 Transaction, which is incorporated by reference as Exhibit 4.2 to this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as the master servicer under the pooling and servicing agreement for the JPMBB 2014-C25 Transaction, is also the primary servicer of this loan combination. The responsibilities of Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as primary servicer of this loan combination, are subsumed within its responsibilities as master servicer under the pooling and servicing agreement for the JPMBB 2014-C25 Transaction. Thus, the servicer compliance statement provided by Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as master servicer under such pooling and servicing agreement, encompasses its roles
as both master servicer and primary servicer with respect to this loan combination.


 


Wells Fargo Bank, National Association is the certificate administrator of the mortgage loans serviced under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and the primary servicer and certificate administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan. As a result, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association is a “servicer” as defined in Item 1108(a)(2)(iii) of Regulation AB, in the capacities described above, because it is servicing mortgage loans that constituted 10% or more of the assets of the issuing entity as of its cut-off date. The assessments of compliance with applicable servicing criteria, accountants’ attestation reports and servicer compliance statements delivered by Wells Fargo Bank, National Association in the capacities described above are listed in the Exhibit Index.


 


Wells Fargo Bank, National Association is the trustee and custodian of the mortgage loans serviced under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and the custodian of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan. As a result, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association is a servicing function participant in the capacities described above, because it is servicing mortgage loans that constituted 5% or more of the assets of the issuing entity as of its cut-off date. The assessments of compliance with applicable servicing criteria and accountants’ attestation reports delivered by Wells Fargo Bank, National Association in the capacities described above are listed in the Exhibit Index.


 


Pentalpha Surveillance LLC is the senior trust advisor of the mortgage loans serviced under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan. As a result, Pentalpha Surveillance LLC is a servicing function participant in the capacities described above, because it is servicing mortgage loans that constituted 5% or more of the assets of the issuing entity as of its cut-off date. The assessments of compliance with applicable servicing criteria and accountants’ attestation reports delivered by Pentalpha Surveillance LLC in the capacities described above are listed in the Exhibit Index.


 


This Annual Report on Form 10-K includes assessments of compliance with applicable servicing criteria and accountants’ attestation reports from CoreLogic Commercial Real Estate Services, Inc. and National Tax Search, LLC. These entities were engaged by the primary servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan to remit tax payments received from the escrow accounts of borrowers to local taxing authorities, to report tax amounts due, to verify tax parcel information, and to verify non-escrow tax payments. These services are included within the servicing criteria set forth in Items 1122(d)(4)(xi) and 1122(d)(4)(xii). Therefore, under the principles-based definition of “servicer” set forth in Item 1101(j) that looks to the functions that an entity performs, these vendors are “servicers” for the purposes of Item 1122. See Compliance and Disclosure Interpretations, Section 301.01 (Item 1101(j)).


 




PART I 




 


 




Item 1.


Business.





Omitted.




Item 1A.


Risk Factors.





Omitted.




Item 1B.


Unresolved Staff Comments.





None.




Item 2.


Properties.





Omitted.




Item 3.


Legal Proceedings.





Omitted.




Item 4.


Mine Safety Disclosures.





Not applicable.








 



PART II 




 


 




Item 5.


Market for Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities.





Omitted.




Item 6.


Selected Financial Data.





Omitted.




Item 7.


Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.





Omitted.




Item 7A.


Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk.





Omitted.




Item 8.


Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.





Omitted.




Item 9.


Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.





Omitted.




Item 9A.


Controls and Procedures.





Omitted.




Item 9B.


Other Information.





None.








 



PART III 




 


 




Item 10.


Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.





Omitted.




Item 11.


Executive Compensation.





Omitted.




Item 12.


Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.





Omitted.




Item 13.


Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.





Omitted.




Item 14.


Principal Accounting Fees and Services.





Omitted.









 

ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURE ITEMS FOR REGULATION AB

 


Item 1112(b) of Regulation AB, Significant Obligor Financial Information.


 


No single obligor represents 10% or more of the pool assets held by the issuing entity.


 


Item 1114(b)(2) of Regulation AB, Significant Enhancement Provider Financial Information.


 


No entity or group of affiliated entities provides any external credit enhancement or other support for the certificates within this transaction as described under Item 1114(a) of Regulation AB.


 


Item 1115(b) of Regulation AB, Certain Derivatives Instruments (Financial Information).


 


No entity or group of affiliated entities provides any derivative instruments or other support for the certificates within this transaction as described under Item 1115 of Regulation AB.


 


Item 1117 of Regulation AB, Legal Proceedings.


 


The registrant knows of no material pending legal proceeding involving the trust or any party related to the trust, other than routine litigation incidental to the duties of those respective parties, and the following, with respect to Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as certificate administrator and custodian:
 
On June 18, 2014, a group of institutional investors filed a civil complaint in the Supreme Court of the State of New York, New York County, against Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., in its capacity as trustee under 276 residential mortgage backed securities (“RMBS”) trusts, which was later amended on July 18, 2014, to increase the number of trusts to 284 RMBS trusts.  On November 24, 2014, the plaintiffs filed a motion to voluntarily dismiss the state court action without prejudice.  That same day, a group of institutional investors filed a civil complaint in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York (the “District Court”) against Wells Fargo Bank, alleging claims against the bank in its capacity as trustee for 274 RMBS trusts (the “Complaint”).
In December 2014, the plaintiffs’ motion to voluntarily dismiss their original state court action was granted.  As with the prior state court action, the Complaint is one of six similar complaints filed contemporaneously against RMBS trustees (Deutsche Bank, Citibank, HSBC, Bank of New York Mellon and US Bank) by a group of institutional investor plaintiffs.  The Complaint against Wells Fargo Bank alleges that the trustee caused losses to investors and asserts causes of action based upon, among other things, the trustee's alleged failure to (i) enforce repurchase obligations of mortgage loan sellers for purported breaches of representations and warranties, (ii) notify investors of alleged events of default purportedly caused by breaches by mortgage loan servicers, and (iii) abide by appropriate standards of care following alleged events of default. Relief sought includes money damages in an unspecified amount, reimbursement of expenses, and equitable relief.  Other cases
(collectively, the “Additional Complaints”) alleging similar causes of action have been filed against Wells Fargo Bank and other trustees in the same court by RMBS investors in these and other transactions, and these cases have been consolidated before the same judge. On January 19, 2016, an order was entered in connection with the Complaint in which the District Court declined to exercise jurisdiction over 261 trusts at issue in the Complaint; the District Court also allowed Plaintiffs to file amended complaints if they so chose, and three amended complaints have been filed. There can be no assurances as to the outcome of the litigation, or the possible impact of the litigation on the trustee or the RMBS trusts. However, Wells Fargo Bank denies liability and believes that it has performed its obligations under the RMBS trusts in good faith, that its actions were not the cause of any losses to investors, and that
it has meritorious defenses, and it intends to contest the plaintiffs’ claims vigorously.
 


Item 1119 of Regulation AB, Affiliations and Certain Relationships and Related Transactions.


 


The information regarding this Item has been previously provided in a prospectus supplement of the Registrant relating to the issuing entity filed on December 29, 2014 pursuant to Rule 424(b)(5).


 


Item 1122 of Regulation AB, Compliance with Applicable Servicing Criteria.


 


The reports on assessments of compliance with the servicing criteria for asset-backed securities and related attestation reports on such assessments of compliance with respect to the mortgage loans are attached hereto under Item 15 to this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Attached as Exhibit AA to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement incorporated by reference as Exhibit 4.1 to this Annual Report on Form 10-K is a chart identifying the entities participating in a servicing function for the transaction responsible for each applicable servicing criteria set forth in Item 1122(d).

 The reports on assessments of compliance with the servicing criteria for asset-backed securities and related attestation reports on such assessments of compliance with respect to the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan, which is being serviced and administered pursuant to the pooling and servicing agreement for the JPM 2014-C25 Transaction, are attached hereto under Item 15 to this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Attached as Exhibit AA to the pooling and servicing agreement for the JPM 2014-C25 Transaction incorporated by reference as Exhibit 4.2 to this Annual Report on Form 10-K is a chart identifying the entities participating in a servicing function for the JPM 2014-C25 Transaction responsible for each applicable servicing criteria set forth in Item 1122(d).


 


Item 1123 of Regulation AB, Servicer Compliance Statement.


 


The servicer compliance statements are attached as Exhibits to this Annual Report on Form 10-K.


 

PART IV

 


Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules.


 


(a) The following is a list of documents filed as part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K:


 


(1) Not applicable


 


(2) Not applicable


 


(3) See below


 


4.1 Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of December 1, 2014, by and among J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp., as Depositor, Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer and as Special Servicer, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator and as Trustee, and Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor (filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein).


 


4.2 Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of November 1, 2014, by and among J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp., as Depositor, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer, Rialto Capital Advisors, LLC, as Special Servicer, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator, Wilmington Trust, National Association, as Trustee, and Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor (filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference
herein).


 


31 Rule 13a-14(d)/15d-14(d) Certifications.


 


33 Reports on assessment of compliance with servicing criteria for asset-backed securities.




33.1 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer




33.2 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.3 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator




33.4 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian




33.5 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor




33.6 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.7 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.8 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.9 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.10 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.11 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.12 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.13 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.14 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.15 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.16 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.17 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.18 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.19 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.20 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.21 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




33.22 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.23 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.24 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.25 CoreLogic Commercial Real Estate Services, Inc., as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




33.26 National Tax Search, LLC, as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




 


34 Attestation reports on assessment of compliance with servicing criteria for asset-backed securities.




34.1 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer




34.2 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.3 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator




34.4 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian




34.5 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor




34.6 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.7 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.8 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.9 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.10 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.11 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.12 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.13 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.14 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.15 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.16 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.17 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.18 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.19 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.20 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.21 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




34.22 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.23 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.24 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.25 CoreLogic Commercial Real Estate Services, Inc., as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




34.26 National Tax Search, LLC, as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




 


35 Servicer compliance statements.




35.1 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer




35.2 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.3 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator




35.4 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.5 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.6 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.3)




35.7 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.8 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.9 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.3)




35.10 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.11 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.12 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.3)




35.13 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




35.14 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




 


99.1 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association (filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)


 


99.2 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and Column Financial, Inc. (filed as Exhibit 99.2 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)


 


99.3 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and Barclays Bank PLC (filed as Exhibit 99.3 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)


 


99.4 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, among J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp., Redwood Commercial Mortgage Corporation and Redwood Trust, Inc. (filed as Exhibit 99.4 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)


 


99.5 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and General Electric Capital Corporation (filed as Exhibit 99.5 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 


99.6 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and RAIT Funding, LLC (filed as Exhibit 99.6 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)


 


(b) The exhibits required to be filed by the Registrant pursuant to Item 601 of Regulation S-K are listed above and in the Exhibit Index that immediately follows the signature page hereof.


 


(c) Not Applicable.


 
SIGNATURES


 


Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


 


J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp.


(Depositor)


 


/s/ Kunal K. Singh


Kunal K. Singh, President and Chief Executive Officer



(senior officer in charge of securitization of the depositor)


 



Date: March 25, 2016



 


 


Exhibit Index


 


Exhibit No.


 


4.1 Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of December 1, 2014, by and among J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp., as Depositor, Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer and as Special Servicer, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator and as Trustee, and Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor (filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein).
 
4.2 Pooling and Servicing Agreement, dated as of November 1, 2014, by and among J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp., as Depositor, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer, Rialto Capital Advisors, LLC, as Special Servicer, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator, Wilmington Trust, National Association, as Trustee, and Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor (filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference
herein).
 


31 Rule 13a-14(d)/15d-14(d) Certifications.


 


33 Reports on assessment of compliance with servicing criteria for asset-backed securities. 




33.1 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer




33.2 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.3 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator




33.4 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian




33.5 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor




33.6 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.7 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.8 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.9 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.10 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.11 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.12 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.13 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.14 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.15 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.16 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.17 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.1)




33.18 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.19 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.20 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.21 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




33.22 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.3)




33.23 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.4)




33.24 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 33.5)




33.25 CoreLogic Commercial Real Estate Services, Inc., as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




33.26 National Tax Search, LLC, as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




 





34 Attestation reports on assessment of compliance with servicing criteria for asset-backed securities.




34.1 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer




34.2 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.3 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator




34.4 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian




34.5 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor




34.6 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.7 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.8 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.9 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.10 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.11 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.12 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.13 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.14 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.15 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.16 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.17 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.1)




34.18 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee and Certificate Administrator of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.19 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.20 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.21 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




34.22 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.3)




34.23 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Custodian of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.4)




34.24 Pentalpha Surveillance LLC, as Senior Trust Advisor of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 34.5)




34.25 CoreLogic Commercial Real Estate Services, Inc., as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




34.26 National Tax Search, LLC, as Servicing Function Participant of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




 





35 Servicer compliance statements.




35.1 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Master Servicer




35.2 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.3 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator




35.4 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.5 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.6 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the 500 Fifth Avenue Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.3)




35.7 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.8 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.9 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the St. Louis Premium Outlets Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.3)




35.10 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.11 Midland Loan Services, a Division of PNC Bank, National Association, as Special Servicer of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.1)




35.12 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of The Outlet Shoppes of the Bluegrass Mortgage Loan (see Exhibit 35.3)




35.13 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Primary Servicer of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




35.14 Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Certificate Administrator of the Florida Multifamily Portfolio Mortgage Loan




 


99.1 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and JPMorgan Chase Bank, National Association (filed as Exhibit 99.1 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 
99.2 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and Column Financial, Inc. (filed as Exhibit 99.2 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 
99.3 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and Barclays Bank PLC (filed as Exhibit 99.3 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 
99.4 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, among J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp., Redwood Commercial Mortgage Corporation and Redwood Trust, Inc. (filed as Exhibit 99.4 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 
99.5 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and General Electric Capital Corporation (filed as Exhibit 99.5 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 
99.6 Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, dated as of December 29, 2014, between J.P. Morgan Chase Commercial Mortgage Securities Corp. and RAIT Funding, LLC (filed as Exhibit 99.6 to the registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 29, 2014 under Commission File No. 333-190246-11 and incorporated by reference herein)
 






R-->Dates Referenced Herein   and   Documents Incorporated by Reference
This ‘10-K’ Filing    Date    Other FilingsFiled as of:3/25/16Filed on / For Period End:3/24/161/19/1612/31/1512/29/14424B5,  8-K12/1/1411/24/1411/1/147/18/146/18/14 List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0001056404-16-003703   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Sat, 29 Jul 07:37:15.1 GMT 










DBRS.com: Issuer: JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26































Advanced Search 













Request DBRS subscription?


JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26
Structured Finance:CMBS
Summary

        Log into DBRS' Interactive iReports Platform for CMBS Reports, Surveillance Updates,
        and Supporting Data ireports.dbrs.com.
    

(no summary available)
If you would like more information about this issuer, please sign in.




Contacts


Peter Wideman
Senior Financial Analyst - North American CMBS


+1 416 597 7466
pwideman@dbrs.com
 
Stephen Koehler
Assistant Vice President - North American CMBS


+1 312 332 9446
skoehler@dbrs.com
 
Richard Carlson
Senior Vice President - North American CMBS


+1 312 332 9451
rcarlson@dbrs.com
 
Erin Stafford
Managing Director, Head of North American CMBS - Global Structured Finance


+1 312 332 3291
estafford@dbrs.com
 





































close
Request a DBRS.com Trial Now!
        or Contact Us to get started.

Request DBRS subscription?



 















JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C23 Credit Rating - Moody's






















































Yes
No





























About Moody'sCareersRegulatory AffairsTerms of UseContact UsAbout Moody'sCompany OverviewInvestor RelationsMedia RelationsCorporate Social ResponsibilityAlumni













GO






































There are too many sessions currently in use on this account















Log In




Cancel


































Research & Ratings

OverviewRatings NewsRating MethodologiesRatings DisclosuresRatings PerformanceRegulatory AffairsCode of Professional ConductSector in DepthLook Up a RatingFind an AnalystInteractive ChartsMarket SegmentCorporatesFinancial InstitutionsStructured FinanceManaged InvestmentsInfrastructure & Project FinanceSovereign & SupranationalSub-SovereignU.S. Public FinanceRegionNorth AmericaLatin America & CaribbeanEurope, Middle East & AfricaAsia PacificResearch TypeIssuer ResearchIndustry / Sector ResearchMethodologyCapital Markets ResearchDefault & Ratings AnalyticsEconomic ResearchData ReportsPolitical / Economic GroupEmerging MarketsEuropean UnionAsia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC)Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS)EurozoneGulf Cooperation CouncilMercosurOrganisation for Economic Co-operation and Development  (OECD)Credit PolicyRating MethodologiesRequests for CommentThe Commercial GroupHow to Get RatedRatings DefinitionsRatings Policy & Approach



Products & Solutions

OverviewProducts Listing by A - ZMoody's AnalyticsMoody's Pricing & Valuations ToolsMoody's Advisory ServicesMoody's Economy.comMoody’s Training & CertificationSolutionsAsset and Liability Management SolutionsCredit Origination SolutionsCredit Risk SolutionsData SolutionsEconomic SolutionsInsurance SolutionsInvestment & Pensions SolutionsLearning Solutions and CertificationsPortfolio Management SolutionsRegulatory and Accounting SolutionsStructured Finance SolutionsAccess ProductsCredit Risk CalculatorCredit Transition ModelCredit TrendsCreditEdge®Default Recovery Database (DRD)Default Risk Service - StructuredFund MonitoringLossCalc™Market Implied Ratings (MIR®)Moody's Financial Metrics™Moody's Project Finance ScorecardMoody's Quantitative Ratings Estimator (QRATE)Municipal Financial Ratio AnalysisRatings InteractiveRiskCalc™



News & Events

OverviewRatings NewsEventsTraining EventsTopics





Log In
Register







            Log In 

            Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.











                    User Name:





                    Password:









                Automatically log me in when I return





                Log In





                Forgot your Username or Password?




        Or Log In using:

























Please Note


We brought you to this page based on your search query. If this isn't what you are looking for, you can continue to Search Results for ""
















The maximum number of items you can export is 3,000.
  Please reduce your list by using the filtering tool to the left.









Close








































































Back to Previous Page



















Please Log In to access this content






Registered User


        Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.








            User Name:





            Password:








            Automatically log me in when I return



            Log In





            Forgot your Username or Password?



        Or Log In using:
    







Not Registered Yet?

Register now to get FREE access to:
Issuer Ratings.
Ratings on over 170,000 corporate, government and structured finance securities.
Events Calendar.
Information about training seminars, briefings, and teleconferences.
Watchlists.
Listings of issuers under review for rating changes.
Rating Methodologies.
Descriptive frameworks underlying Moody's ratings.

 

Register Now

















JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C23

Moody's Org ID:724050300







Moody's Org ID:724050300

Market Segment:Structured Finance > Commercial MBS > Conduit / Fusion







Please Log In to view this content.



















                                    Research



                                    Ratings



                                    Related Parties







                            Go to CMBS Industry Page
                        









    Deal Research


    Industry Research


    Performance


    Related Parties Research


    Methodology






Results 
        1 - 9
Of 
        9


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        






                Filter By:
            


Document Type - All
Excel Data Supplement
Pre-Sale Report
Rating Action
SEC Rule 17g-7 Report of R&Ws


Source - All
Moody's Investors Service







Date
    
    



Document Type
    



                        Title
                    

                        Source
                    




                    09 Sep 2016
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Upgrades One and Affirms Eleven Classes of JPMBB 2014-C23





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    10 Sep 2015
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Affirms Twelve Classes of JPMCC 2014-C23





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    02 Oct 2014
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Assigns Definitive Ratings to 12 CMBS Classes of JPMBB 2014-C23 Mortgage Trust





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    02 Oct 2014
                

                    SEC Rule 17g-7 Report of R&Ws
                













                                    JPMBB 2014-C23 v1.1 Compared To CMBS v1.0





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    11 Sep 2014
                

                    Excel Data Supplement
                













                                    JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C23 Commercial Mortgage Pass Through Certificates, Series 2014-C23 - Cash Flow Excel Data





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    11 Sep 2014
                

                    Pre-Sale Report
                













                                    JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C23 Commercial Mortgage Pass Through Certificates, Series 2014-C23





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    11 Sep 2014
                

                    Excel Data Supplement
                













                                    JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C23 Commercial Mortgage Pass Through Certificates, Series 2014-C23 - Top Ten Loan Excel Data





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    11 Sep 2014
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Assigns Provisional Ratings to 12 CMBS Classes of JPMBB 2014-C23 Mortgage Trust





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    10 Sep 2014
                

                    SEC Rule 17g-7 Report of R&Ws
                













                                    JPMBB 2014-C23 Deal v1.0 Compared To CMBS v1.0





                    Moody's Investors Service
                





Results 
        1 - 9
Of 
        9


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        
















                6The rating history for this credit rating accurately reflects the current status of the (sf) indicator but, due to technical limitations, does not accurately reflect the (sf) indicator history. Please visit the Research tab to view the press release(s) announcing when the (sf) indicator was added or removed.


For credit ratings that are derived exclusively from an existing credit rating of a program, series, category/class of debt, support provider or primary rated entity, or that replace a previously assigned provisional rating at the same rating level, Moody’s publishes a rating announcement on that series, category/class of debt or program as a whole, on the support provider or primary rated entity, or on the provisional rating, but often does not publish a specific rating announcement on each subsequent bond or note for which the credit rating is derived from the existing credit rating. Rating announcements are usually press releases classified as Rating Actions on www.moodys.com. Please refer to the Research tab on the issuer/entity page for the rating announcement.
















Moody's Integrity Hotline
EU

001-800-506-1440
Japan

KDDI: 00-539-111 then 888-320-1668
NTT: 0034-811-001 then 888-320-1668
Outside of the EU and Japan

1-866-330-MDYS (6397)



Browse By
HomeResearch & RatingsProducts & SolutionsNews & EventsCareers


Contact Us
Help & SupportContact UsSubmit a Complaint


Terms & Conditions
Terms of UsePrivacy PolicyProprietary Rights





            © 2017 Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Moody’s Analytics, Inc. and/or their affiliates and licensors. All rights reserved.
        

           Regional Sites:
            
GlobalArgentinaAsiaAustraliaBoliviaBrazilCanadaCEEChinaCzech RepublicCISEMEAFranceGermanyIndonesiaIndiaItalyJapanKoreaMexicoMiddle EastPolandSouth AfricaSpainTurkeyTaiwanUruguay






























































































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 















JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26 Credit Rating - Moody's






















































Yes
No





























About Moody'sCareersRegulatory AffairsTerms of UseContact UsAbout Moody'sCompany OverviewInvestor RelationsMedia RelationsCorporate Social ResponsibilityAlumni













GO






































There are too many sessions currently in use on this account















Log In




Cancel


































Research & Ratings

OverviewRatings NewsRating MethodologiesRatings DisclosuresRatings PerformanceRegulatory AffairsCode of Professional ConductSector in DepthLook Up a RatingFind an AnalystInteractive ChartsMarket SegmentCorporatesFinancial InstitutionsStructured FinanceManaged InvestmentsInfrastructure & Project FinanceSovereign & SupranationalSub-SovereignU.S. Public FinanceRegionNorth AmericaLatin America & CaribbeanEurope, Middle East & AfricaAsia PacificResearch TypeIssuer ResearchIndustry / Sector ResearchMethodologyCapital Markets ResearchDefault & Ratings AnalyticsEconomic ResearchData ReportsPolitical / Economic GroupEmerging MarketsEuropean UnionAsia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC)Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS)EurozoneGulf Cooperation CouncilMercosurOrganisation for Economic Co-operation and Development  (OECD)Credit PolicyRating MethodologiesRequests for CommentThe Commercial GroupHow to Get RatedRatings DefinitionsRatings Policy & Approach



Products & Solutions

OverviewProducts Listing by A - ZMoody's AnalyticsMoody's Pricing & Valuations ToolsMoody's Advisory ServicesMoody's Economy.comMoody’s Training & CertificationSolutionsAsset and Liability Management SolutionsCredit Origination SolutionsCredit Risk SolutionsData SolutionsEconomic SolutionsInsurance SolutionsInvestment & Pensions SolutionsLearning Solutions and CertificationsPortfolio Management SolutionsRegulatory and Accounting SolutionsStructured Finance SolutionsAccess ProductsCredit Risk CalculatorCredit Transition ModelCredit TrendsCreditEdge®Default Recovery Database (DRD)Default Risk Service - StructuredFund MonitoringLossCalc™Market Implied Ratings (MIR®)Moody's Financial Metrics™Moody's Project Finance ScorecardMoody's Quantitative Ratings Estimator (QRATE)Municipal Financial Ratio AnalysisRatings InteractiveRiskCalc™



News & Events

OverviewRatings NewsEventsTraining EventsTopics





Log In
Register







            Log In 

            Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.











                    User Name:





                    Password:









                Automatically log me in when I return





                Log In





                Forgot your Username or Password?




        Or Log In using:

























Please Note


We brought you to this page based on your search query. If this isn't what you are looking for, you can continue to Search Results for ""
















The maximum number of items you can export is 3,000.
  Please reduce your list by using the filtering tool to the left.









Close








































































Back to Previous Page



















Please Log In to access this content






Registered User


        Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.








            User Name:





            Password:








            Automatically log me in when I return



            Log In





            Forgot your Username or Password?



        Or Log In using:
    







Not Registered Yet?

Register now to get FREE access to:
Issuer Ratings.
Ratings on over 170,000 corporate, government and structured finance securities.
Events Calendar.
Information about training seminars, briefings, and teleconferences.
Watchlists.
Listings of issuers under review for rating changes.
Rating Methodologies.
Descriptive frameworks underlying Moody's ratings.

 

Register Now

















JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26

Moody's Org ID:724168624







Moody's Org ID:724168624

Market Segment:Structured Finance > Commercial MBS > Conduit / Fusion







Please Log In to view this content.



















                                    Research



                                    Ratings



                                    Related Parties







                            Go to CMBS Industry Page
                        









    Deal Research


    Industry Research


    Performance


    Related Parties Research


    Methodology






Results 
        1 - 8
Of 
        8


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        






                Filter By:
            


Document Type - All
Pre-Sale Report
Rating Action
SEC Rule 17g-7 Report of R&Ws


Source - All
Moody's Investors Service







Date
    
    



Document Type
    



                        Title
                    

                        Source
                    




                    09 Jun 2017
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Upgrades Eight CMBS IO Classes, Downgrades 243 CMBS IO Classes and Withdraws 51 CMBS IO Classes from 294 US and Canadian CMBS Deals following the Implementation of Updated Structured Finance Interest-Only Methodology





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    13 Oct 2016
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Affirms Twelve Classes of JPMBB 2014-C26





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    13 Nov 2015
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Affirms Twelve Classes of JPMBB 2014-C26





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    05 Jan 2015
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Assigns Definitive Ratings to Twelve CMBS Classes of JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    30 Dec 2014
                

                    SEC Rule 17g-7 Report of R&Ws
                













                                    JPMBB 2014-C26 Deal v1.1 Compared To CMBS v1.0





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    09 Dec 2014
                

                    Pre-Sale Report
                













                                    JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Trust 2014-C26 Commercial Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 2014-C26





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    08 Dec 2014
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Assigns Provisional Ratings to Twelve CMBS Classes of JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    08 Dec 2014
                

                    SEC Rule 17g-7 Report of R&Ws
                













                                    JPMBB 2014-C26 Deal v1.0 Compared To CMBS v1.0





                    Moody's Investors Service
                





Results 
        1 - 8
Of 
        8


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        
















                6The rating history for this credit rating accurately reflects the current status of the (sf) indicator but, due to technical limitations, does not accurately reflect the (sf) indicator history. Please visit the Research tab to view the press release(s) announcing when the (sf) indicator was added or removed.


For credit ratings that are derived exclusively from an existing credit rating of a program, series, category/class of debt, support provider or primary rated entity, or that replace a previously assigned provisional rating at the same rating level, Moody’s publishes a rating announcement on that series, category/class of debt or program as a whole, on the support provider or primary rated entity, or on the provisional rating, but often does not publish a specific rating announcement on each subsequent bond or note for which the credit rating is derived from the existing credit rating. Rating announcements are usually press releases classified as Rating Actions on www.moodys.com. Please refer to the Research tab on the issuer/entity page for the rating announcement.
















Moody's Integrity Hotline
EU

001-800-506-1440
Japan

KDDI: 00-539-111 then 888-320-1668
NTT: 0034-811-001 then 888-320-1668
Outside of the EU and Japan

1-866-330-MDYS (6397)



Browse By
HomeResearch & RatingsProducts & SolutionsNews & EventsCareers


Contact Us
Help & SupportContact UsSubmit a Complaint


Terms & Conditions
Terms of UsePrivacy PolicyProprietary Rights





            © 2017 Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Moody’s Analytics, Inc. and/or their affiliates and licensors. All rights reserved.
        

           Regional Sites:
            
GlobalArgentinaAsiaAustraliaBoliviaBrazilCanadaCEEChinaCzech RepublicCISEMEAFranceGermanyIndonesiaIndiaItalyJapanKoreaMexicoMiddle EastPolandSouth AfricaSpainTurkeyTaiwanUruguay






























































































JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26 Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26
                    

•   BOSTON, MA
                          • Trust
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Jpmbb Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-c26 is based out of Boston.   
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust 2014-C26, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




jpmbb commercial mortgage securities trust 2014-c26


C/O STATE STREET BANK &AMP; TRUST CO

BOSTON
MA
                                                        
                                                    02110


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      2126483063
SEC SIC CODE:6189-ASSET-BACKED SECURITIES







Recent SEC Filings




10-D filed on 06/29/2017
10-D filed on 06/01/2017
10-D filed on 04/28/2017
10-D filed on 03/29/2017
10-K filed on 03/22/2017
10-D filed on 03/02/2017
10-D filed on 01/31/2017
10-D filed on 12/29/2016
10-D filed on 12/01/2016
10-D filed on 10/28/2016
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free



















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started












































INITIAL PRICING: JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust, 2014-C26































  


















Remember Me

















HomeTop NewsRegional DigestsMidwest DigestMidwest ArchiveMid-Atlantic DigestMid-Atlantic ArchiveNortheast DigestNortheast ArchiveSouth Central DigestSouth Central ArchiveSoutheast DigestSoutheast ArchiveWest DigestWest ArchiveCMBSPipelineUpcoming/Priced Deals20172016201520142013201220112010Fixed2009Fixed2008Fixed2007FixedFloating2006FixedFloating2005FixedFloating2004FixedFloating2003FixedFloating2002FixedFloating2001FixedFloating2000FixedFloating1999FixedFloatingCMBS Pricing MatrixDatabase201420132012201120102009200820072006200520042003200220012000Special ServicingRankingsB-Piece Buyers201520142013201220112010200720062004Bookrunners20152014201320122011200820072006200520042003200220012000Lenders201520142013200620052004DelinquencyCMBS Issuance DataCRE DataREIT DebtREIT Unsecured DebtLoan SalesOfferingsFDIC Loan-Sales ResultsSales DatabaseRatesSign Up






Follow: 


















 






Advanced Search






Daily market intelligence on mortgages, equity raising, investment sales, and CMBS.




















			Wednesday, 17 December 2014		


						
	  	INITIAL PRICING: JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust, 2014-C26
	  


			Written by 
						Orest Mandzy








font size

decrease font size



increase font size






Print





Email









Rate this item



1
2
3
4
5

(0 votes)













Class
Amt $mln
Sub Level%
Avg Life (yrs)
RatingMoody's 
RatingDBRS 
RatingKroll 
Pricing %
Yield%
Final Pricing (bp)
Bnch mark


A-1
59.05
30.00
3.02 
Aaa
AAA 
AAA
100.000
1.580
+40 
swaps


A-2
211.65
30.00
4.89 
Aaa 
AAA 
AAA
103.000
2.354
+70 
swaps


A-3
300.00
30.00
9.77
Aaa
AAA
AAA
101.000
3.118
+93
swaps


A-4
337.58
30.00
9.89
Aaa
AAA
AAA
102.999
3.494
+95
swaps


A-SB
106.45
30.00
7.30
Aaa
AAA
AAA
103.000
2.829
+85
swaps


A-S
94.22
23.50
9.96
Aa1
AAA
AAA
102.999
3.451
+125
swaps


B
67.05
18.875
9.96
Aa3
AA
AA
103.000
3.601
+140
swaps


C
48.92
15.50
9.96
A3
Ahigh
A
101.484
4.301
+210
swaps


EC
210.19
15.50
9.96
A1
Ahigh
A
 
 
 
swaps


D
106.91
8.125
9.96
NR
BBlow
BBB-
84.471
6.101 
+390
swaps


E
34.43
5.75
9.96
NR
BB
BB
 
 
 
Treas


F
25.37
4.00
9.96
NR
B
B
 
 
 
Treas


NR
57.98
0.00
10.04
NR
NR
NR
 
 
 
Treas


X-A
1,108.95*
NA
NA
Aa1
AAA
AAA
 
 
 
Treas


X-B
67.05*
NA
NA
Aa3
AAA
AAA
4.089
4.180
+210
Treas


X-C
48.92*
NA
NA
A3
AAA
AAA
 
 
 
Treas


X-D
106.91*
NA
NA
NR
AAA
BBB-
 
 
 
Treas


X-E
34.43*
NA
NA
NR
AAA
BB
 
 
 
Treas


X-F
25.37*
NA
NA
NR
AAA
NR
 
 
 
Treas



*Notional amount, interest only
Pricing Date: 16 December, 2014
Collateral balance: $1,449.61 million
Bookrunner(s): JPMorgan Securities (55 percent of pool balance), Barclays Capital (24 percent), Credit Suisse (21 percent)
Lead Managers: JPMorgan Securities, Barclays Capital, Credit Suisse
Co-managers: Drexel Hamilton
B-piece Buyer: BlackRock Realty Advisors Inc.
Master Servicer: Midland Loan Services
Special Servicer: Midland Loan Services
Operating Adviser: Pentalpha Surveillance
Certificate Administrator: Wells Fargo Bank
Trustee: Wells Fargo Bank
Originators: JPMorgan Chase Bank (36.9 percent of pool balance), Column Financial (21 percent), Barclays Bank (18.9 percent), Redwood Commercial Mortgage Corp. (10.9 percent), GE Capital Corp. (7.1 percent), RAIT Funding (5.1 percent)
Number of Loans/Properties: 69/93
Top-10 Concentration: 37.6 percent
Property Types: Office (43.5 percent of pool balance), multifamily (16.8 percent), hotel (16.3 percent), retail (15.6 percent), industrial (3.4 percent), manufactured housing (2.4 percent), mixed use (1.4 percent), self storage (0.6 percent)
Underwritten DSCR: 1.69x
Underwritten LTV: 67.2 percent 
Underwritten Debt Yield: 10.3 percent
Weighted Average Mortgage Rate: 4.44151 percent
Full-term IO Loans: 6 loans (12.5 percent of pool balance)
Partial-term IO Loans: 41 loans (66 percent of pool balance)
Largest Loans:

 $100 million piece of a $200 million loan,...


Log In or 
				Subscribe to read more...





“The Weekly”
“The Weekly” is Commercial Real Estate Direct’s PDF newsletter, sent to subscribers every Friday morning. With over 100 news stories published on Commercial Real Estate Direct each week, “The Weekly” features the top stories in commercial real estate that industry participants need to know first. “The Weekly” also contains:

Breaking mortgage, CMBS, and REIT news

Quarterly league tables with rankings of B-piece buyers, book runners, and lenders

Industry moves and changes in “The Insider“

Sign Up for a Trial
 



Additional Info


Syndicate to Realpoint:
No


Subject:
CMBS Pricing (PRICE)


Deal Name:
JPMBB Commercial Mortgage Securities Trust, 2014-C26


Private:
Yes


bloombergDealName:
JPMBB 2014-C26







				Read 554 times			


				Last modified on Friday, 02 January 2015			










Tweet

















Published in
General








Orest Mandzy








Latest from Orest Mandzy


INITIAL PRICING: CGMS Commercial Mortgage Trust, 2017-MDDR


Highland Capital Enters Alternative-Lending Biz


INITIAL PRICING: CD, 2017-CD5


NCREIF Total Return Index Changes Direction and Increases Slightly in 2Q


Historic St. Louis Hotel Sold; $104Mln Mixed-Use Development Slated







More in this category:

			« KBS REIT to Pay $146.8Mln for Arlington, Va., Offices		

			Senate Fails to Extend Terror Insurance Program »
		





			back to top		








Data Digest






 
CMBS DELINQUENCY VOLUME



 
CMBS SPECIAL SERVICING VOLUME




  


Top Bookrunners Domestic, Private-Label CMBS - 2016


Investment Bank
#Deals
Vol$mln
MktShr%


JPMorgan Securities
14.94
10,350.16
15.14


Deutsche Bank
14.21
9,926.60
14.52


Wells Fargo Securities
13.36
9,513.96
13.92


Citigroup
10.87
8,061.79
11.80


Goldman Sachs
10.05
7,563.72
11.07







 
MOODY'S/RCA CPPI
 

 
 


CMBS 2.0 Spreads




   


Top CMBS Loan Contributors - 2016


Lender
#Loans
Vol$mln
MktShr%


JPMorgan Chase Bank
133.67
8,670.33
13.34


Goldman Sachs
156.20
7,418.37
11.41


Deutsche Bank
178.17
6,510.75
10.02


Citigroup
184.41
5,512.20
8.48


Morgan Stanley
113.18
4,130.53
6.35



 
 



















&lt;A href=&quot;http://crenews.advertserve.com/servlet/click/zone?zid=31&amp;pid=0&amp;lookup=true&amp;position=1&quot; mce_href=&quot;https://crenews.advertserve.com/servlet/click/zone?zid=31&amp;pid=0&amp;lookup=true&amp;position=1&quot; target=&quot;_top&quot;&gt; &lt;IMG src=&quot;https://crenews.advertserve.com/servlet/view/banner/image/zone?zid=31&amp;pid=0&amp;position=1&quot; mce_src=&quot;https://crenews.advertserve.com/servlet/view/banner/image/zone?zid=31&amp;pid=0&amp;position=1&quot; height=&quot;300&quot; width=&quot;250&quot; hspace=&quot;0&quot; vspace=&quot;0&quot; border=&quot;0&quot; alt=&quot;Click Here!&quot;&gt; &lt;/A&gt;
 


REITCafe


Challenging Retail Environment Weights on REITsMixed economic news is weighing on retail markets, pushing REIT performance down in 2015. This week, the National Retail Federation announced that back-to-school spending is expected to be down 9.3% in 2015. This news came on the heels of a report from the Commerce Department stating that retail sales declined 0.3%... 
US REITs Feeling Effects from Turmoil in Greece and ChinaInternational economic forces have taken center stage this week, affecting both US stock markets and REITs. The crash in the Chinese stock market and ongoing concerns about the future of Greece in the eurozone drove markets down during the first half of the week. REITs fared better than the overall market...
What Does Increased Construction Mean for Apartment REITs?REITs so far this year have raised $17.1 billion of capital through the sale of unsecured notes, bringing the total raised over the past two and a half years to just more than $75 billion. That’s more than they raised during the previous five years. The massive volume shouldn’t be a surprise as it comes while the yield from 10-year Treasury bonds, the benchmark...

shouldn’t be a surprise as it comes while the yield from 10-year Treasury bonds, the benchmark against which most REIT’s price their bonds








Weekly Archive




								Jul 24 - Aug 11
							


								Jul 17 - Aug 04
							


								Jul 10 - 28
							


								Jul 03 - 21
							


								Jun 26 - Jul 14
							
 

				More
			
























 









LoginAdvertising InfoAbout UsContact UsSign UpTerms


Regional Digest

MidwestMid-AtlanticNortheastSouth CentralSoutheastWest


CMBS

Priced DealsUpcoming DealsDatabaseCMBS Pricing MatrixSpecial ServicingRankingDelinquencyCMBS Issuance Data


CRE Data

REIT DebtREITCafeLoan Sales



Sales DatabaseRatesAdvanced Search



©1999-2017 Commercial Real Estate Direct.All rights reserved.










warehouse-backstage


